Maine, session 132, LD92.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3491, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 300, §1, is further
amended by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph to read:
"Decommissioning" includes the grading to postconstruction grade and revegetation of all
earth disturbed during construction and decommissioning, except for areas already
restored, providing for the recycling of the waste components of the solar energy
development, within 90 days of the physical removal of the waste components from the
development, that are recyclable, including, but not limited to, the solar panels, by a facility
authorized to accept such materials for recycling and providing for the disposal of the waste
components of the solar energy development, within 90 days of the physical removal of the
waste components from the development, that are not recyclable by a facility authorized to
accept such materials for disposal.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.